Utah, session 2026, SB302.
Section 1. Section 77-36-2.2 is amended to read:77-36-2.2. Powers and duties of law enforcement officers to arrest -- Reports of domestic violence cases -- Reports of parties' marital status.(1)The primary duty of law enforcement officers responding to a domestic violence callcall regarding a domestic violence offense is to protect the victim and enforce the law.(2)(a)In addition to the arrest powers described in Section 77-7-2, when a peace officer responds to a domestic violence callcall regarding a domestic violence offense and has probable cause to believe that an act of domestic violencea domestic violence offense has been committed, the peace officer shall arrest without a warrant, or shall issue a citation to, any personindividual that the peace officer has probable cause to believe has committed an act of domestic violencea domestic violence offense.(b)(i)If the peace officer has probable cause to believe that there will be continued violence against the alleged victim, or if there is evidence that the perpetrator has either recently caused serious bodily injury or used a dangerous weapon in the domestic violence offense, the officer shall: (A)arrest and take the alleged perpetrator into custody, and ; and(B)may not utilize the option of issuing a citation under this section.(ii)For purposes of Subsection (2)(b)(i), "serious bodily injury" and "dangerous weapon" mean the same as those terms are defined in Section 76-1-101.5.(c)If a peace officer does not immediately exercise arrest powers or initiate criminal proceedings by citation or otherwise, the officer shall notify the victim of the right to initiate a criminal proceeding and of the importance of preserving evidence, in accordance with the requirements of Section 77-36-2.1.(3)(a)If a law enforcement officer receives complaints of domestic violence offenses from two or more opposing persons, the officer shall evaluate each complaint separately to determine who the predominant aggressor was in the situation.  (b)If the officer determines that one person was the predominant physical aggressor, the officer need not arrest the other person alleged to have committed domestic violencea domestic violence offense.  (c)In determining who the predominant aggressor was, the officer shall consider:(a)(i)any prior complaints of domestic violencea domestic violence offense;(b)(ii)the relative severity of injuries inflicted on each person;(c)(iii)the likelihood of future injury to each of the parties; and(d)(iv)whether one of the parties acted in self defense.(4)A law enforcement officer may not threaten, suggest, or otherwise indicate the possible arrest of all parties in order to discourage any party's request for intervention by law enforcement.(5)(a)A law enforcement officer who does not make an arrest after investigating a complaint of domestic violencea domestic violence offense, or who arrests two or more parties, shall submit a detailed, written report specifying the grounds for not arresting any party or for arresting both parties.(b)A law enforcement officer who does not make an arrest shall notify the victim of the right to initiate a criminal proceeding and of the importance of preserving evidence.(6)(a)A law enforcement officer responding to a complaint of domestic violencea domestic violence offense shall prepare an incident report that includes:(i)the officer's disposition of the case; and(ii)the results of any lethality assessment completed in accordance with Section 77-36-2.1.(b)From January 1, 2009, until December 31, 2013, any law enforcement officer employed by a city of the first or second class responding to a complaint of domestic violence shall also report, either as a part of an incident report or on a separate form, the following information:(i)marital status of each of the parties involved;(ii)social, familial, or legal relationship of the suspect to the victim; and(iii)whether or not an arrest was made.(c)The information obtained in Subsection (6)(b):(i)shall be reported monthly to the department;(ii)shall be reported as numerical data that contains no personal identifiers; and(iii)is a public record as defined in Section 63G-2-103.(d)(b)The incident report shall be made available to the victim, upon request, at no cost.(e)(c)The law enforcement agency shall forward a copy of the incident report to the appropriate prosecuting attorney within five days after the day on which the complaint of domestic violence occurred.(d)If a peace officer did not arrest, or issue a citation to, an individual alleged to have committed a domestic violence offense as described in Subsection (2), the law enforcement agency shall assign a peace officer to complete the investigation of the alleged domestic violence offense within 48 hours after the time at which the call regarding the domestic violence offense was made.(e)(c)If there is evidenceprobable cause that a domestic violence offense was committed, a law enforcement agency shall submit the appropriate charge for the offense to the prosecuting agency within five business days after the day on which the domestic violence offense occurs, unless the law enforcement agency has reasonable cause for the delay.(7)The department shall compile the information described in Subsections (6)(b) and (c) into a report and present that report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee during the 2013 interim, no later than May 31, 2013.(8)(7)(a)Each law enforcement agency shall, as soon as practicable, make a written record and maintain records of all incidents of domestic violence reported to it, and the law enforcement agency.(b)Each incident shall be identified by a law enforcement agency code for domestic violence.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 77-36-2.6 is amended to read:77-36-2.6. Appearance required -- Considerations by court.(1)An alleged perpetrator who is arrested for an offense involving domestic violence shall appear in person or by video before the court or a magistrate within one judicial day after the day on which the arrest is madebe presented without unnecessary delay before a magistrate for the determination of probable cause in accordance with Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure, Rule 9.(2)AnIf an alleged perpetrator who is charged by citation, indictment, or information with an offense involving domestic violence butand has not been arrested, the alleged perpetrator shall appear before the court in person for arraignment or initial appearance as soon as practicable, but no later than 14 days after the next day on which court is in session following the issuance of the citation or the filing of the indictment or information.(3)At the time of an appearance under Subsection (1) or (2), the court shall consider imposing a pretrial protective order in accordance with Section 78B-7-803.(4)An appearance required by this section is mandatory and may not be waived.(4)Appearances required by this section are mandatory and may not be waived.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.